Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.140

Renewal—Delinquency.

(1) If the application for renewal of any license provided for in this chapter is not filed on or prior to the expiration date of the license under this chapter or as set by rule by the director, a penalty of twenty-five dollars for the commercial pesticide applicator's license and the rancher private applicator license, and a penalty equivalent to the license fee for any other license, shall be assessed and added to the original fee and shall be paid by the applicant before the renewal license is issued. However, the penalty does not apply if the applicant furnishes an affidavit certifying that he or she has not acted as a licensee subsequent to the expiration of the license.

(2) Any license for which a timely renewal application has been made, all other requirements have been met, and the proper fee paid, continues in full force and effect until the director notifies the applicant that the license has been renewed or the application has been denied.

[ 2004 c 100 s 5; 1991 c 109 s 36; 1989 c 380 s 47; 1961 c 249 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 100: See note following RCW 17.21.020.